California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(e) The board may provide in the resolution, or in a later resolution adopted by a two-thirds vote of the members of the board, for changes in the assessment to particular real property within the benefit district or any zone therein arising out of changes in the parcel area or floor area of that real property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1322, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

33002.

(a) In determining the amount of a special benefit assessment, the board may measure the benefit to real property in the benefit district or zones therein by the parcel area of unimproved real property and by the parcel area and the floor area of real property and improvements thereto of improved real property, as deemed appropriate by a resolution adopted by a two-thirds vote of the members of the board.

(b) The special benefit assessment constitutes a charge imposed on particular real property for a district project of direct benefit to that property, and does not
 constitute ad valorem taxes or any other form of general tax levy applying a given rate to the assessed valuation of all taxable property within the district.

(c) The district shall possess all powers necessary for, incidental to, or convenient for the collection, enforcement, administration, or distribution of the special benefit assessment in accordance with California law.

(d) The revenue from a special benefit assessment, which is imposed pursuant to this chapter, or from bonds secured by such a special benefit assessment, for the purpose of financing a rail transit station or rail transit related facility located within the benefit district, shall be used only for financing of the facility for which it was levied, and that revenue shall not be used for any other purpose or the payment of any other expense of the district, including, but not limited to, transit,
 transportation, or operating expense.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1322, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

33002.1.

The board may order benefit assessment without an election, except as otherwise provided in Section 33002.2.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1322, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

33002.2.

An election shall be held if the board finds that a petition requesting that the proposal be submitted to confirmation by the voters has been signed by the owners of at least 25 percent of the assessed value of real property within the benefit district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1322, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

33002.3.

(a) For purposes of this chapter, “voter” means an owner of real property which is assessed or proposed to be assessed under this chapter and which is within the boundaries of the benefit district.

(b) In any election conducted under this chapter, each voter in the benefit district may cast one vote for each one thousand dollars ($1,000), or fraction thereof, worth of land or improvements owned by the voter in the benefit district as is shown on the most recent equalized assessment roll.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1322, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

33002.4.

(a) Where land in the benefit district is owned in joint tenancy, tenancy in common, or any other multiple ownership, the owners of that land shall designate in writing which one of the owners shall be deemed the owner of that land for purposes of qualifying as a voter.

(b) The legal representative of a corporation or an estate owning real property in the benefit district may act on behalf of the corporation or the estate.

(c) (1) For purposes of this chapter, “legal representative”
 means an official of a corporation owning real property in the benefit district.

(2) For purposes of this chapter, “legal representative” also means a guardian, conservator, executor, or administrator of the estate of the holder of title to real property in the benefit district who is all of the following:

(A) The person is appointed under the laws of this state.

(B) The person is entitled to the possession of the estate’s real property.

(C) The person is authorized by the appointing court to exercise the particular right, privilege, or immunity which he or she seeks to exercise.

(d) Before a legal representative acts as a voter at a district election, the legal representative shall
 present to the precinct board a certified copy of his or her authority which shall be kept and filed with the returns of the election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1322, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

33002.5.

The petition for confirmation by the voters shall be filed with the board within 30 days after the conclusion of the public hearing required by Sections 33001 and 33001.5. If a petition meeting the requirements of Section 33002. 2 is filed, the board shall adopt a resolution approving the proposal to form a benefit district subject to confirmation by the voters of the benefit district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1322, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

33002.6.

After the board has adopted a resolution approving the proposal to form a benefit district under Section 33002.5, but before the board may levy any assessment, the board shall call an election in the benefit district for the purpose of submitting to the voters the proposition of levying the assessment by the benefit district. The resolution calling the election shall state each of the items required to be contained in the resolution adopted pursuant to Section 33001.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1322, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

33002.7.

The board shall submit the proposition of levying an assessment to the voters of the benefit district in a special election to be held within 90 days following the adoption of the resolution calling an election. The provisions of the Elections Code relating to the manner of voting, the duties of election officers, the canvassing of returns, and all other particulars in respect to the management of elections, insofar as they may be applicable, shall govern all elections conducted pursuant to this chapter.

Ballots for the special election may be distributed to voters by mail with return postage prepaid, and shall
 be received by the district either by mail or hand delivery at the address shown on the postage prepaid envelope no later than 5:00 p.m. on the special election day.

The district shall pay to the county the reasonable expenses that the county incurs in conducting an election under this chapter, and the district may expend funds collected from the benefit assessment approved pursuant to the election for this purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1322, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

33002.8.

If a majority of the votes cast at the election conducted under this chapter approve the proposition, the board may levy the assessment pursuant to the resolution adopted pursuant to Section 33002.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1322, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

33002.9.

(a) Any owner or owners of real property, which is, in whole or in part, within the benefit district, or their legal representatives, may jointly or severally file with the board a petition requesting that the real property owned by them or for which they are the legal representative be excluded from the benefit district on the ground that the real property sought to be excluded is not benefited or that the assessment be reduced on the ground that the assessment exceeds the benefit to that real property.

(b) The real property sought to be excluded or upon which the
 assessment is sought to be reduced shall be described by its legal description and shall be accompanied by a map depicting its location in relation to the benefit district.

(c) The petition shall contain a statement of facts in support of the petition and shall be acknowledged by the owner or the legal representative filing the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1322, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

33002.10.

Notice of each hearing upon the petition for exclusion or reduction shall be given in accordance with subdivisions (d) and (e) of Section 33001.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1322, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

33002.11.

At the time and place provided in the notice or at any time and place to which the hearing is adjourned, the board or its appointed hearing officer shall hear all the following:

(a) The petition for exclusion or reduction.

(b) All evidence or proofs that may be introduced by or on behalf of the petitioners.

(c) All objections to the petition that may be presented in writing by any person, including the district.

(d) All evidence or proofs that may be introduced in support of objections to the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1322, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

33002.12.

The expenses of giving the notice provided for herein and of the hearing on the exclusion or reduction petition shall be paid by the persons filing the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1322, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

33002.13.

Upon the hearing on an exclusion or reduction petition by the board, or upon the record of hearing by a hearing officer, the board shall order the petition be denied when the petitioner has not shown by a preponderance of the evidence that in an exclusion petition his or her real property is not benefited or in a reduction petition that the assessment exceeds the benefit to the property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1322, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

33002.14.

The board, after the hearing on an exclusion or reduction petition, shall order one of the following by resolution:

(a) In the case of an exclusion petition, order the exclusion of all or any part of the real property described in the petition upon its finding that the property will not be benefited by the operations of the district in the vicinity of the benefit district.

(b) In the case of a reduction petition, order a change in the benefit assessment to all or any portion of the real property described in the petition to
 provide that it not exceed the amount of benefit derived by the operations of the district in the vicinity of the benefit district.

(c) Confirm the assessment on the real property subject to the petition as correctly reflecting the amount of benefit to the real property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1322, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

33003.

(a) Following formation of the benefit district or concurrently therewith, if the board deems it necessary to incur a bonded indebtedness for the acquisition, construction, development, joint development, completion, operation, maintenance, or repair of one or more rail transit stations and related rail transit facilities located within the benefit district, the board may provide, by resolution, that the bonded indebtedness shall be payable from special benefit assessments levied within the benefit district. The resolution shall be adopted by a two-thirds vote of the members of the board, and shall declare and state all of the
 following:

(1) That the board intends to incur an indebtedness, by the issuance of bonds of the district, for the benefit district which the board has formed, or intends to form, within a portion of the district.

(2) The purposes for which the proposed debt is to be incurred, which may include all costs and estimated costs necessary or convenient for, incidental to, or connected with the accomplishment of the purposes, including, without limitation, engineering, inspection, legal, fiscal agent, financial consultant, bond and other reserve funds, working capital, bond interest estimated to accrue during the construction period, if any, and for a period not exceeding three years thereafter, and the expenses of all proceedings for the authorization, issuance, and sale of the bonds.

(3) The estimated cost of
 accomplishing the purposes and the amount of the principal of the indebtedness to be incurred.

(4) That a general description of the benefit district and of each zone, if any, therein and maps showing the exterior boundaries thereof are on file with the secretary of the district and available for inspection by any interested person.

(5) That special benefit assessments for the payment of the bonds, and the interest thereon, have been or shall be levied in the benefit district or zones therein by the parcel area of unimproved real property and by the parcel area and the floor area of real property and improvements thereto of improved real property, as deemed appropriate by a resolution adopted by a two-thirds vote of the members of the board, at rates which are sufficient in the aggregate, together with revenues already collected and available therefor, to pay the principal of, and
 interest on, all bonds of the district issued for the benefit district.

(6) The extent to which, if at all, all or a portion of the revenues of the district are to be used to pay the principal of, interest on, and sinking fund payments for, the bonds, including the establishment and maintenance of any reserve fund therefor.

(7) The time and place set for hearing on the proposed issuance of the bonds. 

(8) That at the same time as the Board of Supervisors of the County of Los Angeles is required by law to fix the general tax levy and in the manner provided for the general tax levy, the district board shall levy and collect special benefit assessments in the benefit district or zones therein by the parcel area of unimproved real property and by the parcel area and the floor area of real property and improvements
 thereto of improved real property, as deemed appropriate by the district board, at rates which are sufficient in the aggregate, together with revenues already collected and available therefor, to pay the interest on the bonds as it becomes due, and the part of the principal of the bonds, including sinking fund installments required by any of the district’s agreements with bondholdlers, as will become due before proceeds of a special benefit assessment, levied at the time of the next general tax levy, will be available for those purposes; and to provide or to restore the bond reserve fund to the amount required by any of the district’s agreements with bondholders.

(9) The maximum term the proposed bonds shall run before maturity, which shall not exceed 40 years from the date of the bonds or any series thereof.

(10) The maximum rate or rates of interest to be paid, which shall not
 exceed 12 percent per annum.

(11) That the pledge of special benefit assessment revenues to the bonds authorized by this section has priority over the use of any of those revenues for pay-as-you-go financing, except to the extent that this priority is expressly restricted by any of the district’s agreements with bondholders.

(b) The notice stating the time and place of the hearing on the proposed issuance of bonds shall be published prior to the time fixed for the hearing pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code.

(c) Notice shall also be mailed at least 30 days prior to the hearing to all owners of real property within the boundaries of the benefit district whose names and addresses appear on the last equalized assessment roll or are otherwise known to the Board of Supervisors of the County of Los Angeles or
 to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1322, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

33004.

At the time and place fixed for the hearing on the issuance of bonds payable from special benefit assessments levied under this chapter, or at any time and place to which the hearing is adjourned, the board shall proceed with the hearing. Interested persons may appear at the hearing and present matters material to the questions set forth in the resolution. At the conclusion of the hearing on the proposed issuance of bonds, the board shall, by resolution adopted by a two-thirds vote of the members, determine whether to incur the bonded indebtedness.

The resolution shall state the amount of the proposed debt, the
 purposes for which it is to be incurred, and the estimated cost of accomplishing the purposes. The determinations made in the resolution are final and conclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1322, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

33005.

Special benefit assessments for the payment of the principal of, and interest on, bonds issued for a benefit district shall be levied in the benefit district at rates which are sufficient in the aggregate, together with revenues already collected and available therefor, to pay the principal of, and interest on, all bonds of the district issued for the benefit district. Other revenues of the district shall be used for the payment of the principal of, and interest on, the bonds only to the extent set forth in any agreement of the district for the benefit of bondholders.

Special benefit assessments in the benefit
 district and zones, if any, therein shall be calculated to reflect, as accurately as possible, the benefit received by the property assessed in the benefit district or zones, if any, therein as a result of the project to be financed thereby.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1322, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

33006.

The bonds issued pursuant to this chapter shall bear interest at a rate or rates not exceeding 12 percent per annum, payable semiannually, except that the first interest payable on the bonds or any series thereof may be for any period not to exceed one year as determined by the board.

In the resolution or resolutions providing for the issuance of bonds, the board may also provide for call and redemption of the bonds prior to maturity at times and prices and upon any other terms that it may specify. However, no bond is subject to call or redemption prior to maturity unless the bond contains a recital to that
 effect. The denomination or denominations of bonds shall be stated in the resolution providing for their issuance, but shall not be less than five thousand dollars ($5,000). The principal of, and interest on, the bonds shall be payable in lawful money of the United States at the office of the treasurer of the district or at any other place or places that may be designated by the board, or at either place or places at the option of the holders of the bonds. The bonds shall be dated, numbered consecutively, signed by the president and treasurer, and countersigned by the secretary and shall have the official seal of the district attached. The interest coupons of the bonds shall be signed by the treasurer. The seal and all signatures and countersignatures may be printed, lithographed, or mechanically reproduced, except that one signature or countersignature shall be manually affixed.

If an officer, whose signature or countersignature appears on the bonds or coupons,
 leaves office for any reason prior to the delivery of the bonds, the officer’s signature is as effective as if the officer had remained in office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1322, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

33007.

The bonds issued pursuant to this chapter may be sold as the board determines by resolution. The board may sell the bonds at a price below par.

If the board determines by resolution that the bonds shall be sold by competitive bid, the board, before selling the bonds, or any part thereof, shall give notice inviting sealed bids in the manner that it prescribes. If satisfactory bids are received, the bonds offered shall be awarded to the highest responsible bidder. If no bids are received, or if the board determines that the bids received are not satisfactory as to price or responsibility of the bidders, the board
 may reject all bids received, if any, and either readvertise or sell the bonds at private sale or by negotiation, or by other lawful means.

If the board determines by resolution that the bonds shall not be sold by competitive bid, the board may sell the bonds at public or private sale, by negotiation, or by other lawful means.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1322, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

33008.

Delivery of any bonds issued under this chapter may be made at any place either inside or outside the state, and the purchase price may be received in cash or bank credits.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1322, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

33009.

All accrued interest and premiums received on the sale of bonds issued by the district pursuant to this chapter shall be placed in the fund to be used for the payment of principal of, and interest on, those bonds. The remainder of the proceeds received on the sale of the bonds shall be placed in the treasury to secure those bonds or for the purposes for which the debt was incurred.

When the purposes for which the debt was incurred have been accomplished, any money remaining shall be either (a) transferred to the fund to be used for the payment of principal of, and interest on, the bonds or (b) placed in a fund to
 be used for the purchase of those outstanding bonds of the district, from time to time, in the open market at the prices and in the manner, either at public or private sale or otherwise, that the board determines. Bonds so purchased shall be canceled immediately.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1322, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

33010.

The board may provide for the issuance, sale, or exchange of refunding bonds to redeem or retire any bonds issued by the district under this chapter upon the terms, at the times, and in the manner that it determines. Refunding bonds may be issued in a principal amount sufficient to pay all, or any part, of the principal of the outstanding bonds issued under this chapter, the interest thereon, and the premiums, if any, due upon call and redemption thereof prior to maturity and all expenses of the refunding.

The provisions of this chapter, for the issuance and sale of bonds apply to the issuance and sale of
 refunding bonds, except that, when refunding bonds are to be exchanged for outstanding bonds, the method of exchange shall be as determined by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1322, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

33011.

Any bonds issued under this chapter are legal investment for all trust funds; for the funds of insurance companies, commercial and savings banks, and trust companies; for state school funds; and, whenever any money or funds may, by any law now or hereafter enacted, be invested in bonds of cities, counties, school districts, or other districts within this state, the money or funds may be invested in the bonds issued under this chapter.

Whenever bonds of cities, counties, school districts, or other districts within this state may, by any law now or hereafter enacted, be used as security for the performance of any
 act or the deposit of any public money, bonds issued under this chapter may be so used.

The provisions of this chapter are in addition to all other laws relating to legal investments and are controlling as the latest expression of the Legislature with respect thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1322, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

33012.

The board may change the purposes for which any proposed debt is to be incurred, the estimated cost, the amount of bonded debt to be incurred, or the boundaries of the benefit district or zones, if any, therein or one or all of those matters, except that the board shall not change the boundaries to include any territory which will not, in its judgment, be benefited by the district action.

For all purposes of this chapter, it is conclusively presumed that any right-of-way of a common carrier will not be benefited by the district action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1322, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

33013.

(a) The board shall not change the purposes, the estimated cost, the boundaries of the benefit district or zones, if any, therein, or the amount of bonded debt to be incurred until after it gives notice of its intention to do so, stating each proposed change in the purpose and stating, if applicable, that the exterior boundaries proposed to be changed are set forth on a map on file with the secretary of the district. The notice shall also specify the time and place set for hearing.

(b) The notice shall be published prior to the time set for the hearing pursuant to
 Section 6066 of the Government Code.

(c) The notice shall also be mailed at least 30 days prior to the hearing to all owners of real property affected by the proposed change whose names and addresses appear on the last equalized assessment roll or are otherwise known to the Board of Supervisors of the County of Los Angeles or to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1322, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

33014.

At the time and place fixed for a hearing on changes, or at any time and place to which the hearing is adjourned, the board shall proceed with the hearing. At the hearing, interested persons may appear and present matters material to the changes set forth in the notice.

At the conclusion of the hearing, the board shall, by resolution, determine whether to make any or all of the changes set forth in the notice. The determinations made in the resolution are conclusive and final.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1322, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

33015.

All decisions and determinations of the board, upon notice and hearing, are final and conclusive upon all persons entitled to appeal to the board as to all errors, informalities, and irregularities which the board might have avoided or remedied during the progress of the proceedings or which it can, at that time, remedy.

Any objection, appeal, or protest not made at the time of any hearing is deemed to be waived voluntarily by any person who might have made the appeal, protest, or objection, and the person is deemed to have consented to the action taken following the hearing and any other matter on which
 objection, protest, or appeal could have been made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1322, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

33016.

Any action or proceeding, other than a petition for election pursuant to Section 33002.2, which contests, questions, or denies the validity or legality of the formation of any benefit district or zone, the issuance of any bonds therefor pursuant to this chapter, or any proceedings relating thereto, shall be commenced within six months from the date of the formation; otherwise, the formation of the benefit district or zone, the issuance of the bonds, and all proceedings relating thereto shall be held to be in every respect valid, legal, and incontestable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1322, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

33017.

When the board has imposed a special benefit assessment, the secretary shall so certify to the assessor of the county in which the territory of any benefit district is located and deliver to the assessor copies of all maps and diagrams of the benefit district and zones, if any, therein, indicating the amount of the special benefit assessment to be levied within the benefit district and zones, if any, therein.

Special benefit assessments authorized by this chapter shall be levied and collected by the county at the same time and in the same manner as taxes are levied and collected. The county may deduct its
 reasonable expenses of collection and shall transmit the balance of the assessments to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1322, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

33019.

In the event of conflict with any other law, the provisions of this chapter shall prevail with respect to benefit districts within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1322, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

33020.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the district shall not pledge any portion of its general fund revenues to pay any part of any bonded indebtedness incurred under this chapter unless required by provisions of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1322, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

33021.

Notwithstanding Section 5097 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, any petition or claim for refund seeking an exclusion of real property or the reduction of an assessment on any grounds for the 2004–05 fiscal year or in any subsequent fiscal year pursuant to this chapter shall be filed within two years after the making of the payment sought to be refunded.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 590, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4. ORANGE COUNTY TRANSIT DISTRICT [40000. - 40617.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [40000. - 40014.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [40000. - 40006.]

40000.

This part shall be known and cited as the “Orange County Transit District Act of 1965.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40001.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the provisions of this article govern the construction of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40002.

“District” means the Orange County Transit District formed under this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40003.

“Board” means the board of directors of this district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40004.

“Voter” means any elector who is registered under the Elections Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40005.

“Transit” means the transportation of passengers only and their incidental baggage by means other than by chartered bus, sightseeing bus, or any other motor vehicle not on an individual passenger fare-paying basis and includes carpools and ridesharing in private vehicles. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the district from leasing its buses to private certified public carriers or to prohibit the district from providing schoolbus service for the transportation of pupils between their homes and schools.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 367, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

40006.

“Transit works” or “transit facilities” means all real and personal property, equipment, rights, or interests owned or to be acquired by the district for transit service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [40010. - 40014.]

40010.

It is necessary that a transit district be established in Orange County in order to provide an interim solution to the transit problem of this area pending inclusion, if at all, of Orange County into the Southern California Rapid Transit District. The problem is unique in that presently there are several existing transportation facilities serving various parts of the area but independently operated, without interchange of transportation services, and without possibility of merger. The geographic location of the area requiring transportation services makes it necessary to develop a single transit system to protect the public interest.

It shall be the ultimate purpose of the Orange County Transit District to establish, when financing therefor becomes feasible, a permanent rapid transit system designed to be part of a unified Los Angeles-Orange County areawide regional system. When such permanent system is planned it shall incorporate physical characteristics necessary for full compatibility with the system of the Southern California Rapid Transit District, and unified management of the operations of such an areawide system shall be provided. Such unified management may be provided by management or operating contract with, or by annexation of the Orange County Transit District to, the Southern California Rapid Transit District or by any other lawful means; and shall take into full account the financial burdens already assumed by the citizens of the area comprising the Los Angeles Rapid Transit District to establish its system, which should be recognized in the operation of the unified system. The
 share of such financial burdens to be assumed by the Orange County Transit District, determined by its board by agreement with the board of the Southern California Rapid Transit District to be in the best mutual interest of the citizens of the two districts, may be made payable out of bond proceeds (subject to authorization of the bonds at an election), tax levies or any other available funds and may be made payable at such times and upon such rate of interest and other terms as shall be agreed between the boards of the two districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40011.

The Orange County Transit District as created and established by the voters of the County of Orange comprises all that portion of the County of Orange lying within the exterior boundaries thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

40012.

Except as otherwise provided in this part elections shall be held and conducted and the result ascertained, determined, and declared in all respects as nearly as practicable in conformity with the general election laws of the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40013.

Except as otherwise provided in this part all ordinances and notices which are required to be published shall be published within the district pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40014.

Whenever the signature of any officer or employee of a district or of any member of the retirement board or of any officer or employee of the retirement system is authorized or required under the provisions of this part, except in the single instance provided in Section 40243, the signature may be made by the use of a plate bearing facsimilies of such signatures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Internal Organization of District [40060. - 40098.]



  ARTICLE 1. Government [40060. - 40062.]

40060.

The members of the Orange County Transportation Authority, comprised as specified by Section 130052, shall serve as the board of directors of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 983, Sec. 1.   Operative December 1, 1991, or sooner, as prescribed by Sec. 8 of Ch. 983.)
-------------------------------------------

40061.

The board of directors shall select one of its members as chairman.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40062.

The board shall determine the number of, and appoint the officers of the district. Any officer of the Orange County Transportation Authority may also serve as an officer of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 983, Sec. 3.   Operative December 1, 1991, or sooner, as prescribed by Sec. 8 of Ch. 983.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Powers and Duties of Directors [40070. - 40081.]

40070.

The chairman is the presiding officer of the board and he shall vote on the propositions passed upon by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40071.

The first meeting of the board shall be held within 10 days after the board of supervisors certifies the results of the election to the Secretary of State pursuant to Section 40050. The board may make its own rules of procedure and determine the place and time of its meeting.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40072.

The board shall select one of its members vice chairman, who shall preside in the absence of its chairman. The board shall provide for and select such officers as it deems necessary to conduct the affairs of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40073.

All matters and things necessary for the proper administration of the affairs of the district which are not provided for in this part shall be provided for by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40074.

The board shall supervise and regulate every transit facility owned and operated by the district, including the fixing of rates, rentals, charges and classifications, and the making and enforcement of rules, regulations, contracts, practices, and schedules, for or in connection with any transit facility owned or controlled by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40075.

The board may either operate the transit system itself or a part thereof or it may contract with any other public or private agency or corporation to operate all or part of the transit system for the district or it may contract with any other public or private agency or corporation for the improvement in transit services, facilities, equipment or operations being operated and conducted by said agency or corporation in, and, or, out of, the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1899.)
-------------------------------------------

40077.

The board may, from time to time, contract for or employ any professional service required by the district or for the performance of work or services which cannot satisfactorily be performed by the regular employees of the district.

The board may contract for the services of a treasurer, auditor, counsel, clerk, and general manager.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 546.)
-------------------------------------------

40078.

(a) The Auditor of the County of Orange shall provide the board with an annual audit of all books and accounts of the district, unless an audit by a certified public accountant or public accountant is otherwise provided by the board. The county auditor may make, or may contract with a certified public accountant or public accountant to make, the annual audit. Any costs incurred by the county auditor, including contracts with or employment of, a certified public accountant or public accountant, in making the audit pursuant to this section shall be borne by the district.

(b) Where an
 audit of the district’s accounts and records is made by a certified public accountant or public accountant, the minimum requirements of the audit shall be prescribed by the State Controller and shall conform to generally accepted auditing standards. A report shall be filed with the Auditor of the County of Orange within 12 months of the end of the fiscal year under examination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 546.)
-------------------------------------------

40079.

Payment of claims against the district and disbursement of district funds shall be in the manner provided for claims against a county and disbursements of funds of a county.
